Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202566-1618
Council; members; appointment; terms.

(1)(a) The council shall be appointed by the Governor.

(b) The council shall consist of five members, including two members representing retail marketers, one member representing wholesalers, suppliers, and importers, one member representing manufacturers and distributors of liquefied petroleum gas equipment, and the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee. Other than the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee, members shall be full-time employees or owners of businesses in the industry or representatives of agriculture cooperatives. Only one person from any company or an affiliated company may serve on the council at a time. All members shall be Nebraska residents, except that the members representing wholesalers, suppliers, and importers and manufacturers and distributors of liquefied petroleum gas equipment may be residents of other states.

(2) Members of the council shall serve terms of four years. Members filling unexpired terms shall be appointed in a manner consistent with this section. Members may serve a maximum of two consecutive full terms, except that members filling unexpired terms may serve a maximum of ten consecutive years. Members filling unexpired terms shall be appointed in a manner consistent with this section. Former members may be reappointed if they have not been members for a period of two years.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 18;

Laws 2008, LB805, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 30.